Utah statutes.
38-10-102.1.   Perfection of lien -- Notice of subcontractor's claim --
Information required to be provided -- Payments to be held in trust.
(1) (a)  To perfect a lien a subcontractor must comply with the requirements
of this section and Section 38-10-105.
(b)  This section shall apply only to a subcontractor's claim or a portion of
a claim for amounts more than $5,000, for work performed upon or materials or
equipment furnished for each production unit.
(2)  A subcontractor shall provide notice of a subcontractor's claim to the
owner and operator designated by the owner within 20 days after the
commencement of work or the furnishing of materials or equipment.
(3)  The notice shall:
(a)  be delivered, or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to
the:
(i)  owner; and
(ii)  operator designated by the owner;
(b)  be considered delivered when deposited in the mail; and
(c)  contain a statement setting forth the following information:
(i)  identification of the lien claimant by full name, address, and telephone
number;
(ii)  the name of the person by whom he was employed or to whom he furnished
material or equipment; and
(iii)  a description of the property comprising the production unit.
(4)  Failure to deliver or mail the notice shall discharge and satisfy the
lien attaching to the interest of the owner to the extent the owner pays a
contractor or operator his share of all, or part, of the lien claimant's
agreed contract price.
(5) (a)  Any contractor or subcontractor shall provide, in writing, to each
person with whom he contracts:
(i)  the full name and address of the:
(A)  owner of the production unit; and
(B)  the operator designated by the owner; and
(ii)  a description of the property comprising the production unit.
(b)  Failure to provide the information required under this section within
three days after the work is commenced or the materials and equipment are
furnished shall entitle the claimant to an award of costs and attorneys' fees
in an action against the person to enforce the contract.
(6)  Any contractor, operator, or subcontractor who receives payment for work
performed upon, or material or equipment furnished for any production unit,
shall hold all payments in trust for the person with whom he contracts for
work upon, or the furnishing of materials or equipment for the production
unit, for any amount remaining unpaid under the contract.
